Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-231
Reserved name.

(MBCA 4.02) (a) A person may reserve the
exclusive use of a corporate name, including a fictitious name for a foreign
corporation whose corporate name is not available, by delivering an application
to the Secretary of State for filing. The application must set forth the name
and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved. If the
Secretary of State finds that the corporate name applied for is available,
the Secretary of State shall reserve the name for the applicant's exclusive
use for a nonrenewable one-hundred-twenty-day period.

(b) The owner of a reserved
corporate name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering
to the Secretary of State a signed notice of the transfer that states the
name and address of the transferee.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 31.